Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-701.01
Department of Transportation; Director-State Engineer; control, management, supervision, administration.

The Director-State Engineer shall have full control, management, supervision, administration, and direction of the Department of Transportation. All powers and duties lawfully conferred upon the department shall be exercised under the direction of the Director-State Engineer.

Laws 1955, c. 338, § 1, p. 1050;

Laws 1957, c. 365, § 11, p. 1238;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 276.